District of Columbia statutes.
1-529.01

Application.

This subchapter shall apply to any District employee or District retiree who is covered by the retirement program defined under § 1-702(7), or the retirement program established by §§ 1-626.03 to 1-626.12, or an officer, member, or retiree of the United States Park Police Force, or an officer, member or retiree of the United States Secret Service to whom the District of Columbia Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act (D.C. Code § 5-707 et seq.) applies.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-214, § 2, 36 DCR 513
Oct. 16, 1992, 106 Stat. 2167, Pub. L. 102-422, § 1(1)
June 28, 1994, 108 Stat. 730, Pub. L. 103-268, § 1(a)
Section 1(b) of Pub. L. 103-268 provided that the amendment made by subsection (a) shall take effect as if included in the enactment of the District of Columbia Spouse Equity Act of 1988.
For temporary repeal of the Police Officers’, Fire Fighters’, and Teachers’ Defined Benefit Pension Program Emergency Establishment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-369, August 21, 1996, 41 DCR 4637), see § 5 of the New Hires Police Officers, Fire Fighters, and Teachers Pension Modification Congressional Adjournment Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-10, March 3, 1997, 44 DCR 1633).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 11-218 repealed D.C. Act 11-369.
1981 Ed., § 1-3001.
This section is referenced in § 1-529.03, § 1-529.04, § 5-723.05, and § 38-2021.17.